Nebraska, session 109, LB477.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB477 LB477
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-3502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-3502 For purposes of the Workplace Privacy Act:
(1) Adverse action means the discharge of an employee, a threat
against an employee, or any other act against an employee that negatively
affects the employee’s employment;
(2) Applicant means a prospective employee applying for employment;
(3) Electronic communication device means a cellular telephone,
personal digital assistant, electronic device with mobile data access,
laptop computer, pager, broadband personal communication device, two-way
messaging device, electronic game, or portable computing device;
(4) Employee means an individual employed by an employer;
(5)(a) (5) Employer means (i) a public or nonpublic entity or an
individual engaged in a business, an industry, a profession, a trade, or
other enterprise in the state, including any agent, representative, or
designee acting directly or indirectly in the interest of such an
employer, (ii) a subcontractor of such an employer, and (iii) a customer
of such an employer. ; and
(b) Employer does not include a passenger as defined in section
75-323; and
(6)(a) Personal Internet account means an individual’s online
account that requires login information in order to access or control the
account.
(b) Personal Internet account does not include:
(i) An online account that an employer or educational institution
supplies or pays for, except when the employer or educational institution
pays only for additional features or enhancements to the online account;
or
(ii) An online account that is used exclusively for a business
purpose of the employer.
Sec. 2. Section 48-3503, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-2-

LB477 LB477
2025 2025
amended to read:
48-3503 (1) No employer shall:
(a) (1) Require or request that an employee or applicant provide or
disclose any user name or password or any other related account
information in order to gain access to the employee's or applicant's
personal Internet account by way of an electronic communication device;
(b) (2) Require or request that an employee or applicant log into a
personal Internet account by way of an electronic communication device in
the presence of the employer in a manner that enables the employer to
observe the contents of the employee’s or applicant’s personal Internet
account or provides the employer access to the employee's or applicant's
personal Internet account; or
(c) (3) Require an employee or applicant to add anyone, including
the employer, to the list of contacts associated with the employee's or
applicant’s personal Internet account or require or otherwise coerce an
employee or applicant to change the settings on the employee's or
applicant's personal Internet account which affects the ability of others
to view the content of such account. ; or
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, no
employer shall require an employee to utilize an application on an
electronic communication device or wear an electronic communication
device to track the employee's location or travel patterns or to confirm
contacts with other employees.
(b) The prohibition in subdivision (2)(a) of this section does not
apply if the Governor proclaims a state of emergency for a pandemic
pursuant to section 81-829.40 and the following conditions are met:
(i) The state of emergency proclamation permits an employer to use
an electronic communication device for contact tracing purposes only;
(ii) The contact tracing is permitted only on the employer's
premises during employee work hours; and
(iii) The data collected during the contact tracing is not included
-3-

LB477 LB477
2025 2025
in the employee's personnel files and is destroyed within forty-eight
hours after the expiration of any tracing period recommended by the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit an employer from
tracking the location of property owned by the employer so long as the
property and employee possessing or using the property are not associated
in the data collected.
(d) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit an employer from
monitoring the use of employer property for productivity or other job-
related metrics so long as the property and employee possessing or using
the property are not associated in the data collected.
(e) Any data collected that associates an employee with property
that is being tracked for travel patterns shall be stored by an
independent third party and shall only be accessible by warrant.
(3) An employer shall not take (4) Take adverse action against, fail
to hire, or otherwise penalize an employee or applicant:
(a) For for failure to provide or disclose any of the information or
to take any of the actions specified in subsection (1) subdivisions (1)
through (3) of this section; .
(b) For refusing to utilize an application or wear a device or be
subject to tracking or surveillance as described in subdivision (2)(a) of
this section; or
(c) Based on information obtained by the employer in violation of
subdivision (2)(a) of this section.
Sec. 3. Original sections 48-3502 and 48-3503, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-